California, session 20252026, AB28.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Section 43031 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:43031.(a)For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1)“CalEPA” means the California Environmental Protection Agency.(2)“Gas temperature” is the temperature of underground landfill gas measured at a wellhead.(3)“Landfill gas” has the same meaning as provided in Section 95475 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.(4)“Local enforcement agency” means an enforcement agency, as defined by Section 40130, that has been certified by the department for purposes of this section.(5)“MSW landfill” means a municipal solid waste landfill subject to either the performance standards described in Section 60.755 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations or the national emission standards for hazardous air pollutants described in Subpart AAAA (commencing with Section 63.1930) of Part 63 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as those regulations existed on January 1, 2025.(6)“Multiagency coordination group” means a group of agencies selected and coordinated by CalEPA to investigate a subsurface elevated temperature event and how to achieve resolution.(7)“Operator” has the same meaning as provided in Section 95475 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.(8)“Resolution” means all of the following have occurred:(A)A subsurface elevated temperature event occurs, followed by gas temperature decreasing to below 131 degrees Fahrenheit for three or more consecutive monthly monitoring periods covering 60 consecutive days, so that a subsurface elevated temperature event no longer exists.(B)The operator of the MSW landfill provides notice to residents within four miles of the MSW landfill to inform them of the gas temperature decrease and that the MSW landfill no longer meets the criteria established by the department pursuant to subdivision (c), (d), or (e), as applicable.(C)The local enforcement agency, in consultation and agreement with the department, provides written consent to the operator of resolution.(9)“Subsurface elevated temperature event” means an elevated landfill gas temperature that persists for three or more consecutive monthly monitoring periods covering 60 consecutive days, as described in subdivision (c), (d), or (e).(b)The operator of a MSW landfill shall monitor landfill gas temperature in accordance with regulations adopted by the State Air Resources Board, as described in subdivision (j).(c)If the gas temperature is 131 degrees Fahrenheit or higher for three consecutive monthly monitoring periods covering 60 consecutive days, and if other criteria established by the department are met or exceeded, including, but not limited to, the gas and liquid threshold levels permitted in the landfill and the number of wellheads exceeding these limits over a particular geographic area, then all of the following shall be done:(1)Within 48 hours, the operator shall notify the local enforcement agency and the department of the subsurface elevated temperature event.(2)Within 14 days, the operator shall file with the local enforcement agency and the department both the actions it has taken in response to the subsurface elevated temperature event and the root cause analysis prepared pursuant to Section 60.36f of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(3)Within 21 days, the local enforcement agency and the department shall engage with the operator to work towards resolution. The department shall inspect the MSW landfill, assess the nature and extent of the subsurface elevated temperature event, and provide technical support to the local enforcement agency.(4)Within 30 days, and on a monthly basis thereafter until resolution, the operator shall, for each wellhead at the MSW landfill that met or exceeded the temperature and other requirements described in this subdivision, report the weekly temperature to the local enforcement agency and the department.(5)Within 45 days, the operator shall file a corrective action plan for review by the local enforcement agency and the department.(d)In addition to the requirements in subdivision (c), if the gas temperature is 146 degrees Fahrenheit or higher for three consecutive monthly monitoring periods covering 60 consecutive days, and if other criteria established by the department are met or exceeded, including, but not limited to, the gas and liquid threshold levels permitted in the landfill and the number of wellheads exceeding these limits over a particular geographic area, then all of the following shall be done:(1)Within 48 hours, the operator shall notify the local enforcement agency and the department of the subsurface elevated temperature event.(2)Within nine days, the local enforcement agency and the department shall engage with the operator to work towards resolution. The department shall inspect the MSW landfill and assess the nature and extent of the subsurface elevated temperature event and try to determine why actions taken pursuant to subdivision (c) did not achieve resolution.(3)Within 30 days, and on a monthly basis thereafter until resolution, the operator shall, for each wellhead at the MSW landfill that met or exceeded the temperature and other requirements described in this subdivision, post the weekly temperature on its internet website.(4)Within 45 days, the operator shall submit to the multiagency coordination group any corrective action plans that have been developed to achieve resolution.(5)The multiagency coordination group shall continue to monitor the situation and advise until resolution.(6)After the formation of the multiagency coordination group, CalEPA shall develop a fact sheet specific to the subsurface elevated temperature event and include information from the assessment developed pursuant to paragraph (7). The operator shall send residents located within four miles of the MSW landfill a notice regarding the sustained elevated gas temperature event that includes the fact sheet developed by CalEPA. The operator shall send monthly updates, including, but not limited to, the sustained elevated gas temperature, the actions the operator has taken to address the sustained elevated gas temperature, and other relevant information to residents located within four miles of the MSW landfill, until resolution. The local enforcement agency or department may require the operator to provide the notice and update to residents beyond four miles from the MSW landfill.(7)The Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment shall, as quickly as possible, use the Community Assessment for Public Health Emergency Response Toolkit, established by the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention to provide information regarding the effects of the subsurface elevated temperature event on a community, and post this information on its internet website. The operator shall also post this information on its internet website.(e)In addition to the requirements in subdivisions (c) and (d), if the gas temperature is 170 degrees Fahrenheit or higher for three consecutive monthly monitoring periods covering 60 consecutive days, and if other criteria established by the department are met or exceeded, including, but not limited to, the gas and liquid threshold levels permitted in the landfill and the number of wellheads exceeding these limits over a particular geographic area, then all of the following shall be done:(1)Within 48 hours, the operator shall notify the local enforcement agency and the department of the subsurface elevated temperature event.(2)Within nine days, the local enforcement agency and the department shall engage with the operator to work towards resolution. The department shall inspect the MSW landfill and assess the nature and extent of the subsurface elevated temperature event and try to determine why actions taken pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) did not achieve resolution.(3)Within 45 days, the operator and the multiagency coordination group shall meet to review a corrective action plan to achieve resolution.(f)If the gas temperature is 170 degrees Fahrenheit or higher for three consecutive monthly monitoring periods covering 60 consecutive days, then any of the following may be done:(1)Within 14 days, if the department determines that the subsurface elevated temperature event poses an imminent and substantial risk to the public health, safety, or environment of the surrounding community, the local enforcement agency or the department may suspend the operator’s permits to operate the portion of the MSW landfill affected by the subsurface elevated temperature event until the department determines that the imminent threat or substantial risk is resolved.(2)If the local enforcement agency has been designated to proclaim a local emergency pursuant to Section 8630 of the Government Code, it may proclaim a local emergency. If the local enforcement agency has not been designated to proclaim a local emergency, it may request a local emergency be proclaimed by the appropriate city, county, or city and county pursuant to Section 8630 of the Government Code. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to limit the authority of the governing body of a city, county, city and county, or an official designated by ordinance adopted by that governing body to proclaim a local emergency.(3)The department may request the Governor to proclaim a state of emergency.(g)A local enforcement agency shall maintain constant communication with the department to ensure the operator of the MSW landfill has implemented a corrective action plan for the subsurface elevated temperature event.(h)(1)In addition to any other remedies provided by law, the department or local enforcement agency may impose an administrative civil penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day for failing to comply with any of the following:(A)Paragraph (1), (2), or (4) of subdivision (c).(B)Paragraph (1) or (3) of subdivision (d).(C)Paragraph (1) of subdivision (e).(2)The department or local enforcement agency shall impose a penalty not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) for each week that a subsurface elevated temperature event described in subdivision (e) persists if the department determines that the subsurface elevated temperature event poses an immediate and substantial risk to the public health, safety, or environment of the surrounding community and that the operator’s gross negligence has caused either of the following:(A)The subsurface elevated temperature event.(B)A failure to achieve resolution of the subsurface elevated temperature event.(3)All penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Landfill Subsurface Fire Mitigation Account, which is hereby created. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys in the Landfill Subsurface Fire Mitigation Account shall be available for expenditure by the department to mitigate harm to a person or community adversely affected by a subsurface temperature event. The department shall prioritize use of penalty moneys to a person or community adversely affected by a subsurface temperature event at the MSW landfill for which the penalty was imposed.(4)Part 5 (commencing with Section 45000) does not apply to this section.(i)(1)The department and local enforcement agency shall comply with Article 2 (commencing with section 44305) of Chapter 4 when suspending a permit pursuant to this section.(2)A permit suspended pursuant to this section shall be reinstated upon resolution, subject to additional operating conditions imposed by the department.(j)The State Air Resources Board shall establish mandatory requirements for the monitoring of landfill gas temperature as part of its regulations on methane emissions from municipal solid waste landfills (Subarticle 6 (commencing with Section 95460) of Article 4 of Subchapter 10 of Chapter 1 of Division 3 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations) consistent with this section.(k)On or before July 1, 2027, the department shall establish minimum guidelines to identify and manage subsurface elevated temperature events and minimum standards for a corrective action plan. When developing these guidelines and standards, the department shall coordinate with the State Air Resources Board to ensure consistency with its regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (j) and consider existing federal, state, and local standards, recommendations, and guidance, and may consider information provided by stakeholders with expertise in the operation and management of solid waste facilities and the management of subsurface temperature events.(l)An operator is liable to the local enforcement agency and the department for the actual and reasonable costs they incur pursuant to this section.(m)(1)Within 48 hours of making a request pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 60.34f of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations to establish a higher operating temperature value at a particular well, the operator shall notify the local enforcement agency, the department, and any other state agency designated by CalEPA. The notice shall include a copy of the request. The operator shall also provide notice of approval or denial of the request, including any conditions attached to an approval, within five days of receipt of the approval or denial.(2)On or before July 1, 2026, an operator that made a request prior to January 1, 2026, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 60.34f of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations to establish a higher operating temperature value at a particular well and had that request approved shall provide a copy of the request and the notice of approval, including any condition attached to the approval, to the local enforcement agency, the department, and any other state agency designated by CalEPA.(3)The local enforcement agency and the department shall post on their internet websites a request and notice of approval or denial of the request, including any conditions attached to an approval, provided to the local enforcement agency or the department pursuant to this subdivision.(n)The department shall adopt emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code for the establishment of criteria for purposes of subdivisions (c), (d), and (e).(o)No rule, policy, or standard of general application issued by the department for either of the following purposes shall be subject to the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code:(1)The development and implementation of a corrective action plan for purposes of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c), paragraph (4) of subdivision (d), or paragraph (3) of subdivision (e). (2)The imposition of additional operating requirements on a reinstated permit for purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (i).SECTION 1. Section 43031 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:43031. (a) For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions apply:(1) “Local enforcement agency” means the enforcement agency, as defined by Section 40130, that had jurisdiction over a solid waste landfill at the time a subsurface elevated temperature event was discovered.(2) “Subsurface elevated temperature event” means an event where subsurface gas or waste temperatures at a solid waste landfill persistently exceed 131 degrees Fahrenheit over a substantial area, as determined by the department.(b) If a subsurface elevated temperature event occurs, the owner or operator of the solid waste landfill shall do all of the following:(1) Notify the department, state water board, State Air Resources Board, local enforcement agency, local air pollution control district, local health department, State Department of Public Health, and the appropriate regional water quality control board.(2) Provide subsurface gas and waste temperature data to the department, state water board, State Air Resources Board, local air pollution control district, Department of Toxic Substances Control, and the appropriate regional water quality control board when requested by the department.(3) Notwithstanding Section 40055, take any action that the department deems necessary to mitigate and resolve the subsurface elevated temperature event, including, but not limited to, creating a corrective action plan.(c) If the department requires a corrective action plan, the owner or operator of the solid waste landfill shall do all of the following:(1) Complete a cost assessment for fully implementing the corrective action plan, including, but not limited to, the costs for cleanup, abatement, other remedial actions, and for reimbursing the multiagency coordination group pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 43031.2.(2) Provide, in a form and manner determined by the department, evidence of financial ability sufficient to address costs to implement the corrective action plan. This requirement is in addition to existing financial assurance requirements established under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 22200) of Subdivision 1 of Division 2 of Title 27 of the California Code of Regulations.(3) Pursuant to the regulation adopted pursuant to Section 43509, revise the closure and postclosure maintenance plan to account for additional costs resulting from the subsurface elevated temperature event.(d) If the owner and operator of a solid waste landfill cannot sufficiently cover the cost to manage and implement a corrective action plan, including the cost to make reimbursement pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 43031.2, the Attorney General may, if warranted, pursue an action against the parent company of the owner and operator of the solid waste landfill. This subdivision does not create a cause of action or liability.(e) (1) If the department finds that a solid waste landfill within the jurisdiction of a local enforcement agency is experiencing a subsurface elevated temperature event, the department may, at its sole discretion, become the enforcement agency for all or part of the solid waste landfill.(2) If the department becomes the enforcement agency pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall return the solid waste facility to the jurisdiction of the local enforcement agency upon the department’s finding that the subsurface elevated temperature event has been satisfactorily mitigated or resolved. The department has the sole discretion to return the solid waste facility to the jurisdiction of the local enforcement agency before the subsurface elevated temperature event has been satisfactorily mitigated or resolved.(3) If the department becomes the enforcement agency pursuant to paragraph (1), the department may recover its reasonable and necessary costs for being the enforcement agency from the owner or operator of the solid waste facility that experienced the subsurface elevated temperature event, in a manner determined by the department.(f) (1) In addition to any other remedies provided by law, the department or local enforcement agency may impose an administrative civil penalty of up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per day for failing to comply with subdivision (b) or (c) or any regulation adopted pursuant to this section.(2) All penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Landfill Subsurface Fire Mitigation Community Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys in the Landfill Subsurface Fire Mitigation Community Fund are continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the department to mitigate harm to a person or community adversely affected by a subsurface elevated temperature event.(g) (1) The department shall adopt regulations to implement and enforce this section and Section 43031.2.(2) Regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of these regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, any emergency regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this section shall be filed with the Office of Administrative Law and shall remain in effect for a period of two years or until revised by the department, whichever occurs sooner.(h) The department shall provide regular updates to affected communities, as defined in Section 43031.2, on the status of leachate activity from a subsurface elevated temperature event.(i) Part 5 (commencing with Section 45000) does not apply to this section and Section 43031.2.(j) Any hearing, including a hearing for imposition of administrative penalties, shall be conducted pursuant to the procedural requirements in Sections 44308 and 44310. When the department is the enforcement agency, the hearing shall be held before the Director of Resources Recycling and Recovery.SEC. 2. Section 43031.2 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:43031.2. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Affected community” means a community affected by subsurface elevated temperature event.(2) “Health assessment” means the Community Assessment for Public Health Emergency Response Toolkit, established by the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, as it existed on January 1, 2026.(3) “Multiagency coordination group” means a group of agencies, including, but not limited to, the California Environmental Protection Agency and its boards, departments, and offices, the relevant local air quality management district, local public health office, and local enforcement agency, as defined by Section 43031, and the United States Environmental Protection Agency.(4) “Subsurface elevated temperature event” has the same meaning as in Section 43031.(b) The Secretary for Environmental Protection may select and coordinate a multiagency coordination group to investigate and provide recommendations on how to achieve resolution of a subsurface elevated temperature event.(c) Within 60 calendar days of receiving recommendations from a multiagency coordination group, the local county public health department shall conduct an initial community health needs assessment using the health assessment to identify and collect information regarding the effects of the subsurface elevated temperature event on the affected community and post this information on its internet website. The owner or operator of the solid waste landfill experiencing the subsurface elevated temperature event shall also post this information on its internet website.(d) (1) Upon the request of the multiagency coordination group, the local county public health department shall initiate subsequent community health needs assessments to identify and collect updated information regarding the effects of a subsurface elevated temperature event on the affected community. The local county public health department shall post the findings of a community health needs assessment on its internet website.(2) The local county public health department shall hold at least two public hearings in the affected communities to discuss the findings of the community health needs assessment and how to mitigate impacts.(e) Upon request of the multiagency coordination group, the owner or operator of the solid waste landfill experiencing the subsurface elevated temperature event shall do all of the following:(1) Submit an air monitoring and sampling plan to the multiagency coordination group and the local air district within 30 days of the request that includes the onsite and offsite monitoring and sampling to be conducted.(2) Within 30 days of a request by the local air pollution control district or the multiagency coordination group, revise and resubmit the air monitoring and sampling.(3) No later than 30 days after the submittal of the air monitoring and sampling plan or any requested revisions thereto, begin implementation of the air monitoring and sampling plan. The multiagency coordination group or the local air pollution control district may grant an extension in writing.(4) In addition to any other remedies provided by law, the department or local enforcement agency may impose an administrative civil penalty of up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per day for failing to comply with this section or any regulation adopted pursuant to this section. All penalties collected pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited into the Landfill Subsurface Fire Mitigation Community Fund.(f) The owner and operator of a solid waste landfill that experiences a subsurface elevated temperature event shall reimburse the multiagency coordination group for all reasonable and necessary costs incurred pursuant to this section. Reimbursement shall be on a monthly basis and shall include the hourly staffing and overhead rates incurred by the participating agencies. Reimbursement shall be made directly to the entity that incurred the costs.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SEC. 3.If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.